Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 1
ADMISSION OF MEMBERS AND
LIABILITY TO THIRD PARTIES

7-126-101. No requirement of members.

A nonprofit corporation is not required to have members.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 671, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

7-126-102. Admission.

The bylaws may establish criteria or procedures for admission of members.

No person shall be admitted as a member without such person's consent.

A nonprofit corporation may issue certificates evidencing membership therein.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 671, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

7-126-103. Liability to third parties.

The directors, officers, employees, and members of a nonprofit corporation are not, as such, personally liable for the acts, debts, liabilities, or obligations of a nonprofit corporation.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 671, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

7-126-104. Consideration.

Unless otherwise provided by the bylaws, a nonprofit corporation may admit members for no consideration or for such consideration as is determined by the board of directors.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 671, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.